Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.330

When writs may be made returnable.

Writs of review, mandate, and prohibition issued by the supreme court, the court of appeals, or by a superior court, may, in the discretion of the court issuing the writ, be made returnable, and a hearing thereon be had at any time.

[ 1971 c 81 s 29; 1895 c 65 s 33; RRS s 1031.]